Washington statutes.
RCW 7.96.060

Effect of correction or clarification.

If a timely and sufficient correction or clarification is made, a person may not recover damages for injury to reputation or presumed damages; however, the person may recover all other damages permitted by law.

[ 2013 c 294 s 6.]